Maryland, session 2025, SB0257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
9–311.1.
(d) A voter shall specify in an absentee ballot application submitted in accordance
with subsection (b) of this section:
(1) one of the following methods by which the voter chooses to receive an
absentee ballot:
(i) mail;
(ii) facsimile transmission; or
(iii) the Internet; and
– 1 –

Ch. 279 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) one of the following methods by which the voter chooses to be contacted
by the State Board under subsection (g) of this section before each election:
(i) nonforwardable mail;
(ii) e–mail; or
(iii) text message.
(g) (1) [Not less than 75] DURING THE PERIOD BEGINNING 120 DAYS
BEFORE AN ELECTION AND ENDING 90 days before [the day on which a local board begins
to send absentee ballots to voters] THE ELECTION, the State Board shall send a written
communication to each voter who is on the permanent absentee ballot list [as of a date that
is at least 90 days before the upcoming election] using the method chosen by the voter
under subsection (d)(2) of this section.
(2) The communication required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
shall include:
(i) confirmation that the voter is included on the permanent
absentee ballot list;
(ii) the address of the voter;
(iii) the method by which the voter has chosen to receive an absentee
ballot; and
(iv) a statement that the voter must notify the local board if any of
the changes listed in subsection (j) of this section have occurred.
(3) If the State Board is unable to contact a voter using the method of
communication chosen by the voter under subsection (d)(2) of this section, the State Board
shall [send the written communication] ATTEMPT TO CONTACT THE VOTER using
another method [if the State Board has other contact information for the voter].
(4) If the communication required under paragraph (1) of this subsection
is sent by mail, the envelope shall include a statement, prominently placed, requesting that
the recipient return the communication to the State Board if the intended recipient no
longer lives at that address.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, that this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –